es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal > Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de metal: Kits de mantenimiento de instrumentos de metal; Productos de limpieza y desinfectantes para instrumentos de metal; Herramientas para limpiar instrumentos de metal; Protectores para instrumentos de metal; Lubricantes para instrumentos de metal; Gamuzas para instrumentos de metal
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Κιτ φροντίδας χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Καθαριστικά & απολυμαντικά χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Εργαλεία καθαρισμού χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Προστατευτικά χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων; Λιπαντικά για χάλκινα πνευστά όργανα; Πανιά γυαλίσματος για χάλκινα πνευστά όργανα
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn đồng: Bộ sản phẩm chăm sóc kèn đồng; Sản phẩm làm sạch và vệ sinh kèn đồng; Dụng cụ vệ sinh kèn đồng; Dụng cụ chắn cho nhạc cụ đồng; Chất bôi trơn cho kèn đồng; Vải đánh bóng kèn đồng
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти > Грижа и почистване на духови инструменти: Комплекти за поддръжка на духови инструменти; Препарати за почистване и дезинфекция на духови инструменти; Средства за почистване на духови инструменти; Предпазители за духови инструменти; Лубриканти за духови инструменти; Кърпи за полиране на духови инструменти
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği: Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Bakım Setleri; Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Temizleyici ve Dezenfekte Ediciler; Üflemeli Çalgı Temizleme Araçları; Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Muhafazaları; Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Yağlayıcıları; Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Parlatma Bezleri
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje > Starostlivosť a čistenie dychových nástrojov: Súpravy starostlivosti o dychové nástroje; Čistiace a dezinfekčné prostriedky na dychové nástroje; Nástroje na čistenie dychových nástrojov; Chrániče dychových nástrojov; Mazivá na dychové nástroje; Utierky na leštenie dychových nástrojov
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør > Messingblæser – pleje og rengøring: Messingblæser – rengøringssæt; Messingblæser – rengøringsmidler; Messingblæser – børster, rensere og rengøring; Messingblæser – beskyttelse; Messingblæser – smøremidler; Messingblæser – pudseklude
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala > Održavanje i čišćenje limenih puhaćih glazbala: Setovi za održavanje limenih puhaćih glazbala; Sredstva za čišćenje i dezinfekciju limenih puhaćih glazbala; Alati za čišćenje limenih puhaćih glazbala; Zaštita za limena puhaća glazbala; Maziva za limene instrumente; Krpe za poliranje limenih puhaćih glazbala
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument > Vård och rengöring av bleckblåsinstrument: Rengöringsset för bleckblåsinstrument; Rengöring och sterilisering av bleckblåsinstrument; Borstar, viskor och rengöringsstänger för bleckblåsinstrument; Skydd för bleckblåsinstrument; Smörjmedel för bleckblåsinstrument; Putsdukar till bleckblåsinstrument
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件 > 銅管樂器清潔保養品: 銅管樂器保養組; 銅管樂器清潔消毒劑; 銅管樂器清潔工具; 銅管樂器握把; 銅管樂器潤滑油; 銅管樂器擦拭布
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품 > 금관악기 관리/청소 용품: 금관악기 관리 키트; 금관악기 클리너/소독용품; 금관악기 청소 도구; 금관악기 가드; 금관악기 윤활제; 금관악기 광택용 천
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni > Cura e pulitura ottoni: Kit pulizia ottoni; Prodotti pulizia/igienizzanti ottoni; Spazzole e bacchette per pulitura ottoni; Protezioni ottoni; Lubrificanti per ottoni; Panni lucidatura ottoni
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro > Limpeza e cuidado de instrumentos de sopro: Kits de cuidado de instrumentos de sopro; Produtos de higiene e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro; Ferramentas de limpeza de instrumentos de sopro; Proteções de instrumentos de sopro; Lubrificantes de instrumentos de sopro; Panos de polimento de instrumentos de sopro
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūros rinkiniai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų valikliai ir dezinfekcijos priemonės; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų valymo įrankiai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų apsaugos; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų tepalai; Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų poliravimo šluostės
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet > Vaskipuhaltimien hoito ja puhdistus: Vaskipuhaltimien hoitopakkaukset; Vaskipuhaltimien puhdistus- ja desinfiointiaineet; Vaskipuhaltimien puhdistusvälineet; Vaskipuhaltimien venttiilisuojat; Vaskipuhaltimien voiteluaineet; Vaskipuhaltimien kiillotusliinat
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Zestawy do konserwacji instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Środki do czyszczenia i dezynfekcji instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Szczoteczki, wyciory i patyczki do czyszczenia instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Osłony do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Środki smarujące do instrumentów dętych blaszanych; Ściereczki do polerowania instrumentów dętych blaszanych
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten > Onderhoud en reiniging van koperen blaasinstrumenten: Onderhoudskits voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Borstels, ragers en schoonmaakroedes voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Beschermers voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Smeermiddelen voor koperen blaasinstrumenten; Poetsdoeken voor koperen blaasinstrumenten
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă > Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor din alamă: Seturi de îngrijire a instrumentelor din alamă; Produse de curățare și dezinfectare pentru instrumente din alamă; Dispozitive de curățare a instrumentelor din alamă; Dispozitive de protecție pentru instrumente din alamă; Lubrifianți pentru instrumente din alamă; Cârpe de lustruit pentru instrumente din alamă
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő > Rézfúvóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás: Rézfúvóshangszer-ápoló készletek; Rézfúvóshangszer-tisztítók és -fertőtlenítők; Rézfúvóshangszer-tisztító eszközök; Rézfúvóshangszer-védők; Rézfúvóshangszer-kenőanyagok; Rézfúvóshangszer-polírozókendők
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente > Blechblasinstrumentenpflege &-reinigung: Pflegesets für Blechblasinstrumente; Reinigungs- & Desinfektionsmittel für Blechblasinstrumente; Reinigungswerkzeug für Blechblasinstrumente; Schutzvorrichtungen für Blechblasinstrumente; Klappenöl für Blechblasinstrumente; Poliertücher für Blechblasinstrumente
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres > Entretien et nettoyage des cuivres: Kits d’entretien pour cuivres; Produits nettoyants / assainissants pour cuivres; Outils de nettoyage pour cuivres; Protections pour cuivres; Lubrifiants pour cuivres; Chiffons de polissage pour cuivres
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品 > 金管楽器お手入れ用品: 金管楽器お手入れセット; 金管楽器用クリーナー・洗浄液; 金管楽器用ブラシ・フレキシブルクリーナー; 金管楽器用プロテクター; 金管楽器用潤滑剤; 金管楽器用ポリッシングクロス
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов > Чистка медных духовых инструментов и уход за ними: Наборы для ухода за медными духовыми инструментами; Средства для чистки медных духовых инструментов; Инструменты для чистки медных духовых инструментов; Защитные накладки для медных духовых инструментов; Смазки для медных духовых инструментов; Ткань для полировки медных духовых инструментов
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter > Pleie og rengjøring av messinginstrumenter: Pleiesett for messinginstrumenter; Rengjøringsmidler for messinginstrumenter; Rengjøringsverktøy for messinginstrumenter; Beskyttelse for messinginstrumenter; Smøremidler for messinginstrumenter; Poleringskluter for messinginstrumenter
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal > Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro de metal: Kits de manutenção para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Desinfetantes e limpadores de instrumentos de sopro de metal; Ferramentas de limpeza para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Protetores para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Lubrificantes para instrumentos de sopro de metal; Panos de polimento para instrumentos de sopro de metal
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila > Nega in čiščenje trobil: Kompleti za nego trobil; Čistila in razkužila za trobila; Krpe za čiščenje trobil; Zaščitni pokrovi za trobila; Maziva za trobila; Krpice za poliranje trobil
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění žesťových nástrojů: Soupravy pro údržbu žesťových nástrojů; Čisticí prostředky pro žesťové nástroje; Čisticí kartáče a vytěráky pro žesťové nástroje; Chrániče na žesťové nástroje; Vazelíny pro žesťové nástroje; Čisticí utěrky na žesťové nástroje
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: ชุดการดูแลเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ที่ทำความสะอาดและที่ฆ่าเชื้อสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; เครื่องมือทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ที่รองจับของเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; สารหล่อลื่นของเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง; ผ้าขัดเงาของเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories > Brass Instrument Care & Cleaning: Brass Instrument Care Kits; Brass Instrument Cleaners & Sanitizers; Brass Instrument Cleaning Tools; Brass Instrument Guards; Brass Instrument Lubricants; Brass Instrument Polishing Cloths
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件 > 铜管乐器清洁保养: 铜管乐器保养套装; 铜管乐器清洁与消毒用品; 铜管乐器清洁工具; 铜管乐器护具; 铜管乐器润滑剂; 铜管乐器抛光布